Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.190

Answer of garnishee—Contents—Forms.

(1) The answer of the garnishee shall be signed by the garnishee or attorney or if the garnishee is a corporation, by an officer, attorney or duly authorized agent of the garnishee, under penalty of perjury, and the original and copies delivered, either personally or by mail, as instructed in the writ.

(2) If the writ of garnishment is for a continuing lien, the answer forms shall be as prescribed in RCW 6.27.340 and 6.27.350.

(3) If the writ is not directed to an employer for the purpose of garnishing the defendant's wages, the answer shall be substantially in the following form:

IN THE . . . . . COURT

OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR

THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . .

NO. . . . . .

Plaintiff

vs.

ANSWER

. . . .

TO WRIT OF

Defendant

GARNISHMENT

. . . .

Garnishee Defendant

SECTION I. On the date the writ of garnishment was issued as indicated by the date appearing on the last page of the writ:

(A) The defendant: (check one) . . . . was, . . . . was not employed by garnishee. If not employed and you have no possession or control of any funds of defendant, indicate the last day of employment: . . . . . . .; and complete section III of this answer and mail or deliver the forms as directed in the writ;

(B) The defendant: (check one) . . . . did, . . . . did not maintain a financial account with garnishee; and

(C) The garnishee: (check one) . . . . did, . . . . did not have possession of or control over any funds, personal property, or effects of the defendant. (List all of defendant's personal property or effects in your possession or control on the last page of this answer form or attach a schedule if necessary.)

SECTION II. At the time of service of the writ of garnishment on the garnishee there was due and owing from the garnishee to the above-named defendant $ . . . . .

If there is any uncertainty about your answer, give an explanation on the last page or on an attached page.

SECTION III. An attorney may answer for the garnishee.

Under penalty of perjury, I affirm that I have examined this answer, including accompanying schedules, and to the best of my knowledge and belief it is true, correct, and complete.

. . . .

. . . .

Signature of

Date

Garnishee Defendant

. . . .

. . . .

Signature of person

Connection with

answering for

garnishee

garnishee

. . . .

. . . .

Print name of person signing

. . . .

Address of garnishee

[ 2012 c 159 s 10; 2003 c 222 s 8; 2000 c 72 s 4; 1997 c 296 s 5; 1988 c 231 s 30; 1987 c 442 s 1019; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 15. Formerly RCW 7.33.150.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. SPR 91.04W(c).

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.